test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-ndiko_gt-norm.yaml
## Imperative/Jussive let me write
# 0%<
     ndiko+V+Imprt+ScSg1: andik
     ndiko+V+Imprt+ScSg2: indik
     ndiko+V+Imprt+ScSg3: ondik
     ndiko+V+Imprt+ScPl1: wandik
     ndiko+V+Imprt+ScPl2: ndikuru
     ndiko+V+Imprt+ScPl3: gindik

     ndiko+V+Imprt+ScSg2+OcSg1: indikona
     ndiko+V+Imprt+ScSg3+OcSg1: ondikona
     ndiko+V+Imprt+ScPl2+OcSg1: undikona
     ndiko+V+Imprt+ScPl3+OcSg1: gindikona
#
     ndiko+V+Imprt+ScSg1+OcSg2: andikoni
     ndiko+V+Imprt+ScSg3+OcSg2: ondikoni
     ndiko+V+Imprt+ScPl1+OcSg2: wandikoni
     ndiko+V+Imprt+ScPl3+OcSg2: gindikoni
#
     ndiko+V+Imprt+ScSg1+OcSg3: andikone
     ndiko+V+Imprt+ScSg2+OcSg3: indikone
     ndiko+V+Imprt+ScSg3+OcSg3: ondikone
     ndiko+V+Imprt+ScPl1+OcSg3: wandikone
     ndiko+V+Imprt+ScPl2+OcSg3: undikone
     ndiko+V+Imprt+ScPl3+OcSg3: gindikone
#
     ndiko+V+Imprt+ScSg1+OcPl1: andikonwa
     ndiko+V+Imprt+ScSg2+OcPl1: indikonwa
     ndiko+V+Imprt+ScSg3+OcPl1: ondikonwa
     ndiko+V+Imprt+ScPl2+OcPl1: undikonwa
     ndiko+V+Imprt+ScPl3+OcPl1: gindikonwa
#
     ndiko+V+Imprt+ScSg1+OcPl2: andikou
     ndiko+V+Imprt+ScSg3+OcPl2: ondikou
     ndiko+V+Imprt+ScPl1+OcPl2: wandikou
     ndiko+V+Imprt+ScPl3+OcPl2: gindikou
#
     ndiko+V+Imprt+ScSg1+OcPl3: andikogi
     ndiko+V+Imprt+ScSg2+OcPl3: indikogi
     ndiko+V+Imprt+ScSg3+OcPl3: ondikogi
     ndiko+V+Imprt+ScPl1+OcPl3: wandikogi
     ndiko+V+Imprt+ScPl2+OcPl3: undikogi
     ndiko+V+Imprt+ScPl3+OcPl3: gindikogi
